Georgia statutes. TITLE 13 Contracts
PART 3 Performance Bonds

13-10-40.
(See Editor’s notes.) Large public works contracts; requirement for performance bond.

Except as otherwise provided in Title 32, performance bonds shall be required for all state public works construction contracts with an estimated contract amount greater than $100,000.00; provided, however, that the state may require a performance bond for public works construction contracts that are estimated at $100,000.00 or less. No public works construction contract requiring a performance bond shall be valid for any purpose unless the contractor gives such performance bond. The performance bond shall be in the amount of at least the total amount payable by the terms of the contract and shall be increased as the contract amount is increased.

History.
Code 1981, §13-10-40, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Orders 06.11.20.01, 06.29.20.02, 07.15.20.01, 07.31.20.02, 08.15.20.01, and 08.31.20.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 and 2021 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

13-10-41.
(See Editor’s notes.) Alternatives to performance bond.

When the amount of the performance bond required under this article does not exceed $300,000.00, the state may, in its sole discretion, accept an irrevocable letter of credit by a bank or savings and loan association, as defined in Code Section 7-1-4, in the amount of and in lieu of the bond otherwise required under this article.

History.
Code 1981, §13-10-41, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Orders 06.11.20.01, 06.29.20.02, 07.15.20.01, 07.31.20.02, 08.15.20.01, and 08.31.20.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders/2020-executive-orders.

13-10-42.
(See Editor’s notes.) Maintenance of action on performance bond by obligee.

The obligee in any performance bond required to be given in accordance with this article shall be entitled to maintain an action thereon at any time upon any breach of such bond; provided, however, no action can be instituted on the bonds or security deposits after one year from the completion of the contract and the acceptance of the public work by the state.

History.
Code 1981, §13-10-42, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Orders 06.11.20.01, 06.29.20.02, 07.15.20.01, 07.31.20.02, 08.15.20.01, and 08.31.20.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders/2020-executive-orders.

13-10-43.
Acceptance of electronic signatures and seals.

Public procurement officers shall accept electronic signatures and electronic corporate seals on bonds issued pursuant to this part so long as such signatures and seals comply with the provisions of Chapter 12 of Title 10 and Code Section 33-24-14.

History.
Code 1981, §13-10-43, enacted by Ga. L. 2021, p. 459, § 1-1/SB 169.